District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.09

Waiver of members meeting notice.

(a)

A member may waive notice of a members meeting before, during, or after the meeting.

(b)

A member’s participation in a members meeting shall be a waiver of notice of that meeting unless the member objects to the meeting at the beginning of the meeting or promptly upon the member’s arrival at the meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the meeting.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 509 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.